Utah statutes.
70A-9a-511.   Secured party of record.
(1)  A secured party of record with respect to a financing statement is a
person whose name is provided as the name of the secured party or a
representative of the secured party in an initial financing statement that has
been filed.  If an initial financing statement is filed under Subsection 70A-
9a-514(1), the assignee named in the initial financing statement is the
secured party of record with respect to the financing statement.
(2) If an amendment of a financing statement which provides the name of a
person as a secured party or a representative of a secured party is filed, the
person named in the amendment is a secured party of record.  If an amendment
is filed under Subsection 70A-9a-514(2), the assignee named in the amendment
is a secured party of record.
(3) A person remains a secured party of record until the filing of an
amendment of the financing statement which deletes the person.
